testing/myv-tests-noun.yaml
  Noun - псака: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm including MWN
    псака+N+Nom+Sg+Indef: псака
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Indef: псакань
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Indef: псакань
    псака+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псакадо
    псака+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: псакадо
    псака+N+Dat+Sg+Indef: псаканень
    псака+N+Dat+Pl+Indef: псаканень
    псака+N+Com+Sg+Indef: псаканек
    псака+N+Com+Pl+Indef: псаканек
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Indef: псакавтомо
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Indef: псакавтомо
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Indef: псакашка
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Indef: псакашка
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Indef: псакасо
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Indef: псакасо
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Indef: псакасто
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Indef: псакасто
    псака+N+Ill+Sg+Indef: псакас
    псака+N+Ill+Pl+Indef: псакас
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Indef: псакава
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Indef: псакава
    псака+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псакакс
    псака+N+Tra+Pl+Indef: псакакс
    псака+N+Lat+Sg+Indef: псакав
    псака+N+Lat+Pl+Indef: псакав
    псака+N+TempCx+Sg+Indef: псакане
    псака+N+TempCx+Pl+Indef: псакане
    псака+N+Nom+Sg+Px1Sg: псакам
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg: [псакам, псакан]
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg: псакан
    псака+N+Abl+Sg+Px1Sg: псакадон
    псака+N+Abl+Pl+Px1Sg: псакадон
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Sg: псакавтомон
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Sg: псакавтомон
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Sg: псакашкан
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Sg: псакашкан
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg: псакасон
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg: псакасон
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg: псакастон
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg: псакастон
    псака+N+Ill+Sg+Px1Sg: псаказон
    псака+N+Ill+Pl+Px1Sg: псаказон
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg: псакаван
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg: псакаван
    псака+N+Tra+Sg+Px1Sg: псакаксон
    псака+N+Tra+Pl+Px1Sg: псакаксон
    псака+N+Nom+Sg+Px2Sg: псакат
    псака+N+Nom+Pl+Px2Sg: псакат
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg: псакат
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg: псакат
    псака+N+Abl+Sg+Px2Sg: псакадот
    псака+N+Abl+Pl+Px2Sg: псакадот
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg: псакавтомот
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg: псакавтомот
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px2Sg: псакашкат
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px2Sg: псакашкат
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px2Sg: псакасот
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px2Sg: псакасот
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px2Sg: псакастот
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px2Sg: псакастот
    псака+N+Ill+Sg+Px2Sg: псаказот
    псака+N+Ill+Pl+Px2Sg: псаказот
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px2Sg: псакават
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px2Sg: псакават
    псака+N+Tra+Sg+Px2Sg: псакаксот
    псака+N+Tra+Pl+Px2Sg: псакаксот
    псака+N+Nom+Sg+Px3Sg: псаказо
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg: псаканзо
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg: псаканзо
    псака+N+Abl+Sg+Px3Sg: псакадонзо
    псака+N+Abl+Pl+Px3Sg: псакадонзо
    псака+N+Dat+Sg+Px3Sg: псаканстэнь
    псака+N+Dat+Pl+Px3Sg: псаканстэнь
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg: псакавтомонзо
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg: псакавтомонзо
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px3Sg: псакашканзо
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px3Sg: псакашканзо
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px3Sg: псакасонзо
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px3Sg: псакасонзо
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px3Sg: псакастонзо
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px3Sg: псакастонзо
    псака+N+Ill+Sg+Px3Sg: псаказонзо
    псака+N+Ill+Pl+Px3Sg: псаказонзо
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px3Sg: псакаванзо
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px3Sg: псакаванзо
    псака+N+Tra+Sg+Px3Sg: псакаксонзо
    псака+N+Tra+Pl+Px3Sg: псакаксонзо
    псака+N+Nom+Sg+Px1Pl: псаканок
    псака+N+Nom+Pl+Px1Pl: псаканок
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px1Pl: псаканок
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px1Pl: псаканок
    псака+N+Abl+Sg+Px1Pl: псакадонок
    псака+N+Abl+Pl+Px1Pl: псакадонок
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px1Pl: псакавтомонок
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px1Pl: псакавтомонок
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px1Pl: псакашканок
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px1Pl: псакашканок
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px1Pl: псакасонок
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px1Pl: псакасонок
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px1Pl: псакастонок
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px1Pl: псакастонок
    псака+N+Ill+Sg+Px1Pl: псаказонок
    псака+N+Ill+Pl+Px1Pl: псаказонок
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px1Pl: псакаванок
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px1Pl: псакаванок
    псака+N+Tra+Sg+Px1Pl: псакаксонок
    псака+N+Tra+Pl+Px1Pl: псакаксонок
    псака+N+Nom+Sg+Px2Pl: псаканк
    псака+N+Nom+Pl+Px2Pl: псаканк
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px2Pl: псаканк
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px2Pl: псаканк
    псака+N+Abl+Sg+Px2Pl: псакадонк
    псака+N+Abl+Pl+Px2Pl: псакадонк
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px2Pl: псакавтомонк
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px2Pl: псакавтомонк
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px2Pl: псакашканк
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px2Pl: псакашканк
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px2Pl: псакасонк
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px2Pl: псакасонк
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px2Pl: псакастонк
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px2Pl: псакастонк
    псака+N+Ill+Sg+Px2Pl: псаказонк
    псака+N+Ill+Pl+Px2Pl: псаказонк
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px2Pl: псакаванк
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px2Pl: псакаванк
    псака+N+Tra+Sg+Px2Pl: псакаксонк
    псака+N+Tra+Pl+Px2Pl: псакаксонк
    псака+N+Nom+Sg+Px3Pl: псакаст
    псака+N+Nom+Pl+Px3Pl: псакаст
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl: псакаст
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl: псакаст
    псака+N+Abl+Sg+Px3Pl: псакадост
    псака+N+Abl+Pl+Px3Pl: псакадост
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Pl: псакавтомост
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Pl: псакавтомост
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Px3Pl: псакашкаст
    псака+N+Comp+Pl+Px3Pl: псакашкаст
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl: псакасост
    псака+N+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl: псакасост
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl: псакастост
    псака+N+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl: псакастост
    псака+N+Ill+Sg+Px3Pl: псаказост
    псака+N+Ill+Pl+Px3Pl: псаказост
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Px3Pl: псакаваст
    псака+N+Prl+Pl+Px3Pl: псакаваст
    псака+N+Tra+Sg+Px3Pl: псакаксост
    псака+N+Tra+Pl+Px3Pl: псакаксост
    псака+N+Nom+Pl+Indef: псакат
    псака+N+Nom+Pl+Px1Sg: псакан
    псака+N+Nom+Pl+Px3Sg: псаканзо
    псака+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псакась
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псаканть
    псака+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псакантень
    псака+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псакадонть
    псака+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псакасонть
    псака+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псакастонть
    псака+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакаванть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакавтомонть
    псака+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакашканть
    псака+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакаксонть
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакатне
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакатнень
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакатненень
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакатнеде
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псакатнесэ
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Ela: псакатнестэ
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Ill: псакатнес
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Prl: псакатнева
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псакатнекс
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Lat: псакатнев
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Abe: псакатневтеме
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Comp: псакатнешка
    псака+N+Pl+Def+Com: псакатненек
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псаканзодо
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: псаканзодо
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псаканзодо
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: псаканзодо
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псаканзокс
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Indef: псаканзокс
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псаканзокс
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Indef: псаканзокс
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псаканзось
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псаканзось
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псаканзонть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псаканзонть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псаканзонтень
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псаканзонтень
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псаканзодонть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псаканзодонть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псаканзосонть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псаканзосонть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псаканзостонть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псаканзостонть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псаканзованть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псаканзованть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псаканзовтомонть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псаканзовтомонть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псаканзошканть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псаканзошканть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псаканзоксонть
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псаканзоксонть
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псаканзотне
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псаканзотне
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псаканзотнень
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псаканзотнень
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псаканзотненень
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псаканзотненень
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псаканзотнеде
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псаканзотнеде
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псаканзотнесэ
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ine: псаканзотнесэ
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: псаканзотнестэ
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ela: псаканзотнестэ
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: псаканзотнес
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Ill: псаканзотнес
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl: псаканзотнева
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Prl: псаканзотнева
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псаканзотнекс
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Tra: псаканзотнекс
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: псаканзотнев
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Lat: псаканзотнев
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: псаканзотневтеме
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abe: псаканзотневтеме
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: псаканзотнешка
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Comp: псаканзотнешка
    псака+N+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: псаканзотненек
    псака+N+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Com: псаканзотненек
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псакавтомонзодо
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: псакавтомонзодо
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Indef: псакавтомонзодо
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Pl+Indef: псакавтомонзодо
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псакавтомонзокс
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Indef: псакавтомонзокс
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Indef: псакавтомонзокс
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Pl+Indef: псакавтомонзокс
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзось
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Nom+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзось
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзонть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Gen+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзонть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзонтень
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Dat+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзонтень
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзодонть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abl+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзодонть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзосонть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ine+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзосонть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзостонть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Ela+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзостонть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзованть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Prl+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзованть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзовтомонть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Abe+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзовтомонть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзошканть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Comp+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзошканть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзоксонть
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Tra+Sg+Def: псакавтомонзоксонть
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакавтомонзотне
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Nom: псакавтомонзотне
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакавтомонзотнень
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Gen: псакавтомонзотнень
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакавтомонзотненень
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Dat: псакавтомонзотненень
    псака+N+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакавтомонзотнеде
    псака+N+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Def+Abl: псакавтомонзотнеде
